District of Columbia statutes.
2-301.05e

Repealed

Director of the Office of Contracting and Procurement.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 105e
as added Apr. 15, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(d), 44 DCR 1423
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-82, § 2(a), 45 DCR 772
May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(c), 45 DCR 1687
Oct. 14, 1999, D.C. Law 13-49, § 4, 46 DCR 5153
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 121, 47 DCR 520
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1181.5e.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of the Procurement Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-17, September 12, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5459)
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Chief Procurement Officer Qualification Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-67, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2102).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Procurement Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-62, April 15, 1997, 44 DCR 2413) and § 3(c) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-133, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 4832).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Chief Procurement Officer Qualification Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-185, October 31, 1997, 44 DCR 6962).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-374, April 24, 1998, 45 DCR 4338).